North Carolina statutes. Chapter 43. Land Registration.
Article 3. Procedure for Registration.

§ 43-6.
Who may institute proceedings.

Any person, firm, or corporation, including the State of North Carolina or any political subdivision thereof, being in the peaceable possession of land within the State and claiming an estate of inheritance therein, may prosecute a special proceeding in rem against all the world in the superior court for the county in which such land is situate, to establish his title thereto, to determine all adverse claims and have the title registered. Any number of the separate parcels of land claimed by the petitioner may be included in the same proceeding, and any one parcel may be established in several parts, each of which shall be clearly and accurately described and registered separately, and the decree therein shall operate directly upon the land and establish and vest an indefeasible title thereto. Any person in like possession of lands within the State, claiming an interest or estate less than the fee therein, may have his title thereto established under the provisions of this Chapter, without the registration and transfer features herein provided.

History.

1913, c. 90, s. 4; C.S., s. 2382; 1963, c. 946, s. 1.

§ 43-7.
Land lying in two or more counties.

In every proceeding to register title, in which it is alleged in the petition or made to appear that the land therein described, whether in one or more parcels, is situated partly in one county and partly in another, or is situated in two or more counties, that is to say, when an entire tract, or two or more entire tracts, are situated in two or more counties (but not separate or several tracts in different counties) it shall be competent to institute the proceedings before the clerk of the superior court of any county in which any part of such tract lying in two or more counties is situated, and said clerk shall have jurisdiction both of the parties and of the subject matter as fully as if said land was situated wholly in his county; but upon the entry of a final decree of registration of title, the clerk by or before whom the same was rendered shall certify a copy thereof to the register of deeds of every county in which said land or any part thereof is situated, and the same shall be there filed and recorded; and every such register of deeds, upon demand of the person entitled and payment of requisite fees therefor, shall issue and deliver a certificate of title for that part of said land situated in his county. This section shall apply and become effective in all cases or proceedings heretofore conducted before any clerk of the superior court of this State for registration of title, as in this Chapter authorized, when the land described in the petition as an entire tract was situated in two or more counties, as aforesaid; and upon the filing and recording of a certified copy of the final decree or decree of registration therein, the register of deeds shall issue and deliver a certificate of title to the present owner or person entitled to the same, for that part of the land situated in his county, as aforesaid, upon payment or tender of proper fees therefor.

History.

1919, c. 82, s. 1; C.S., s. 2383.

§ 43-8.
Petition filed; contents; State to be named as respondent; service on State.

Suit for registration of title shall be begun by a petition to the court by the persons claiming, singly or collectively, to own or have the power of appointing or disposing of an estate in fee simple in any land, whether subject to liens or not. Infants and other persons under disability may sue by guardian or trustee, as the case may be, and corporations as in other cases now provided by law; but the person in whose behalf the petition is made shall always be named as petitioner. The petition shall be signed and sworn to by each petitioner, and shall contain a full description of the land to be registered as hereinafter provided, together with a plot of same by metes and bounds, corners to be marked by permanent markers of iron, stone or cement; it shall show when, how and from whom it was acquired, and whether or not it is now occupied, and if so, by whom; and it shall give an account of all known liens, interests, equities and claims, adverse or otherwise, vested or contingent, upon such land. Full names and addresses, if known, of all persons who may be interested by marriage or otherwise, including adjoining owners and occupants, shall be given. If any person shall be unable to state the metes and bounds, the clerk may order a preliminary survey.

Except when the State of North Carolina is the petitioner, all special proceedings filed pursuant to this Article shall name the State of North Carolina as a respondent to the action. Service of process upon the State shall be made in accordance with

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4(j)(3).

History.

1913, c. 90, s. 5; C.S., s. 2384; 1979, c. 73, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Torrens Title in North Carolina-Maybe a Hundred Years Is Long Enough,” see 39 Campbell L. Rev. 271 (2017).

§ 43-9.
Summons issued and served; disclaimer.

Summons shall be issued and shall be returnable as in other cases of special proceedings, except that the return shall be at least 60 days from the date of the summons. The summons shall be served at least 10 days before the return thereof and the return recorded in the same manner as in other special proceedings; and all parties under disabilities shall be represented by guardian, either general or ad litem. If the persons named as interested are not residents of the State of North Carolina, and their residence is known, which must appear by affidavit, the summons must be served on such nonresidents as is now prescribed by law for service of summons on nonresidents.

Any party defendant to such proceeding may file a disclaimer of any claim or interest in the land described in the petition, which shall be deemed an admission of the allegations of the petition, and the decree shall bar such party and all persons thereafter claiming under him, and such party shall not be liable for any costs or expenses of the proceeding except such as may have been incurred by reason of his delay in pleading.

History.

1913, c. 90, s. 6; C.S., s. 2385; 1967, c. 954, s. 3.

§ 43-10.
Notice of petition published.

In addition to the summons issued, prescribed in the foregoing section [§ 43-9], the clerk of the court shall, at the time of issuing such summons, publish a notice of the filing thereof containing the names of the petitioners, the names of all persons named in the petition, together with a short but accurate description of the land and the relief demanded, in some secular newspaper published in the county wherein the land is situate, and having general circulation in the county; and if there be no such paper, then in a newspaper in the county nearest thereto and having general circulation in the county wherein the land lies, once a week for eight issues of such paper. The notice shall set forth the title of the cause and in legible or conspicuous type the words “To whom it may concern,” and shall give notice to all persons of the relief demanded and the return day of the summons: Provided, that no final order or judgment shall be entered in the cause until there is proof and adjudication of publication as in other cases of publication of notice of summons. The provisions of this section, in respect to the issuing and service of summons and the publication of the notice, shall be mandatory and essential to the jurisdiction of the court to proceed in the cause: Provided, that the recital of the service of summons and publication in the decree or in the final judgment in the cause, and in the certificate issued to the petitioner as hereinafter provided, shall be conclusive evidence thereof. The clerk of the court shall also record a copy of said notice in the lis pendens docket of his office and cross-index same as other notices of lis pendens and shall also certify a copy thereof to the superior court of each county in which any part of said land lies, and the clerk thereof shall record and cross-index same in the lis pendens records of his office as other notices of lis pendens are recorded and cross-indexed.

History.

1913, c. 90, s. 7; 1915, c. 128, s. 1; 1919, c. 82, s. 2; C.S., s. 2386; 1925, c. 287.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 property law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1509 (1980).

For article, “Torrens Title in North Carolina-Maybe a Hundred Years Is Long Enough,” see 39 Campbell L. Rev. 271 (2017).

§ 43-11.
Hearing and decree.

Referred to Examiner. — Upon the return day of the summons the petition shall be set down for hearing upon the pleadings and exhibits filed. If any person claiming an interest in the land described in the petition, or any lien thereon, shall file an answer, the petition and answer, together with all exhibits filed, shall be referred to the examiner of titles, who shall proceed, after notice to the petitioner and the persons who have filed answer or answered, to hear the cause upon such parol or documentary evidence as may be offered or called for and taken by him, and in addition thereto make such independent examination of the title as may be necessary. Upon his request the clerk shall issue a commission under the seal of the court for taking such testimony as shall be beyond the jurisdiction of such examiner.

Examiner’s Report. — The examiner shall, within 30 days after such hearing, unless for good cause the time shall be extended, file with the clerk a report of his conclusions of law and fact, setting forth the state of such title, any liens or encumbrances thereon, by whom held, amount due thereon, together with an abstract of title to the lands and any other information in regard thereto affecting its validity.

Exceptions to Report. — Any of the parties to the proceeding may, within 20 days after such report is filed, file exceptions, either to the conclusions of law or fact. Whereupon the clerk shall transmit the record to the judge of the superior court for his determination thereof; such judge may on his own motion certify any issue of fact arising upon any such exceptions to the superior court of the county in which the proceeding is pending, for a trial of such issue by jury, and he shall so certify such issue of fact for trial by jury upon the demand of any party to the proceeding. If, upon consideration of such record, or the record and verdict of issues to be certified and tried by jury, the title be found in the petitioner, the judge shall enter a decree to that effect, ascertaining all limitations, liens, etc., declaring the land entitled to registration accordingly, and the same, together with the record, shall be docketed by the clerk of the court as in other cases, and a copy of the decree certified to the register of deeds of the county for registration as hereinafter provided. Any of the parties may appeal from such judgment to the appellate division, as in other special proceedings.

No Judgment by Default. — No judgment in any proceeding under this Chapter shall be given by default, but the court must require an examination of the title in every instance except as respects the rights of parties who, by proper pleadings, admit the petitioner’s claim. If, upon the return day of the summons and the day upon which the petition is set down for hearing, no answer be filed, the clerk shall refer the same to the examiner of titles, who shall, after notice to the petitioner, proceed to examine the title, together with all liens or encumbrances set forth or referred to in the petition and exhibits, and shall examine the registry of deeds, mortgages, wills, judgments, mechanic liens and other records of the county, and upon such examination he shall, as hereinbefore provided, report to the clerk the condition of the title, with a notice of liens or encumbrances thereon. The examiner shall have power to take and call for evidence in such case as fully as if the application were being contested. If the title shall be found to be in the petitioner, the clerk shall enter a decree to that effect and declaring the land entitled to registration, with entry of any limitations, liens, etc., and shall certify the same for registration, as hereinbefore provided, after approval by the judge of the superior court.

History.

1913, c. 90, s. 8; C.S., s. 2387; 1969, c. 44, s. 48.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Transferring North Carolina Real Estate Part I: How the Present System Functions,” see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 413 (1971).

For article, “Torrens Title in North Carolina-Maybe a Hundred Years Is Long Enough,” see 39 Campbell L. Rev. 271 (2017).

§ 43-12.
Effect of decree; approval of judge.

Every decree rendered as hereinbefore provided shall bind the land and bar all persons and corporations claiming title thereto or interest therein; quiet the title thereto, and shall be forever binding and conclusive upon and against all persons and corporations, whether mentioned by name in the order of publication, or included under the general description, “to whom it may concern”; and every such decree so rendered, or a duly certified copy thereof, as also the certificate of title issued thereon to the person or corporation therein named as owner, or to any subsequent transferee or purchaser, shall be conclusive evidence that such person or corporation is the owner of the land therein described, and no other evidence shall be required in any court of this State of his, her, or its right or title thereto. It shall not be an exception to such conclusiveness that a person is a minor, is incompetent, or is under any disability, but such person may have recourse upon the indemnity fund hereinafter provided for, for any loss the person may suffer by reason of being so concluded. Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 43-10

, such decrees shall not be binding on and include the State of North Carolina or any of its agencies unless the State of North Carolina is made a party to the proceeding and notice of said proceeding and copy of petition, etc., are served upon the State of North Carolina as provided in this Chapter. Such decrees shall, in addition to being signed by the clerk of the court, be approved by the judge of the superior court, who shall review the whole proceeding and have power to require any reformation of the process, pleading, decrees or entries.

History.

1913, c. 90, s. 9; 1919, c. 82, s. 3; C.S., s. 2388; 1925, c. 263; 1979, c. 73, s. 2; 2011-29, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-29, s. 4, effective April 7, 2011, in the first and second sentences, made gender-neutralizing changes; and in the second sentence, substituted “that a person is a minor, is incompetent” for “that the person is an infant, lunatic.”

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Battle to Preserve North Carolina’s Estuarine Marshes: The 1985 Legislations, Private Claims to Estuarine Marshes, Denial of Permits to Fill, and the Public Trust,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 565 (1986).

For article, “Torrens Title in North Carolina-Maybe a Hundred Years Is Long Enough,” see 39 Campbell L. Rev. 271 (2017).